District of Columbia statutes.
28-5104

Trust property; art dealer’s creditors.

Property which is trust property under §§ 28-5102 and 28-5103 shall not be subject to the claims, liens, or security interests of the creditors of the art dealer. The provisions of this section shall be given effect over any contrary provision of the Uniform Commercial Code.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-310, § 5, 57 DCR 12392